California, session 20252026, AB2703.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66093 of the Education Code is amended to read:66093. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) California’s colleges and universities have traditionally been beacons of free thought that challenge students in a peaceful, safe environment. Its institutions of higher education have always been of great pride to the State of California. state.(2) With great risks presented by changes to immigration policies and enforcement at the federal level, it is more important than ever to work to protect the students, faculty, staff, and the public, and ensure that, regardless of their immigration status, they can continue to take advantage of the education to which they are entitled, and are free from intimidation or loss of access to resources and programs that other students enjoy.(3) It is imperative that California put necessary protections in place, and show it will take the necessary steps to ensure that the state’s students, faculty, staff, and the public have every opportunity to continue their education without fear or undue risk.(4) In doing so, California reaffirms the principles that the attainment of education for the betterment of the individual and the community is paramount, regardless of one’s immigration status. It is in the country’s best interests, as a nation of immigrants, which has benefited greatly from immigrants of all walks and backgrounds, to ensure that those who pursue educational and academic growth may further contribute to the productivity of this great state and nation.(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to enact the policies set forth in Section 66093.3 to ensure that California’s public and private institutions of higher education strive to foster a campus community that is safe, welcoming for all, and provides access to services and supports for all students, faculty, and staff regardless of their immigration status.